Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 21.
CRIMINAL PROSECUTIONS — SALARIES OF PROSECUTORS.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1935 session (see Acts 1935, p. 995) and adopted by popular vote at the general election on Nov. 3, 1936. It was declared adopted by the Speaker of the House of Representatives on Jan. 12, 1937.

§ 1. Prosecution by indictment or information.

All offenses heretofore required to be prosecuted by indictment may be prosecuted either by indictment by a grand jury or information filed by the Prosecuting Attorney.

Cross References.

Indictment on criminal charge, Ark. Const., Art. 2, § 8.

§ 2. Salaries of prosecuting attorneys.

The General Assembly of Arkansas shall by law determine the amount and method of payment of salaries of prosecuting attorneys.

Publisher's Notes.

This section probably is superseded in part by Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 31.